Washington statutes.
RCW 5.60.072

Mediation by agency—Privilege and confidentiality.

Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 5.60.070 and chapter 7.07 RCW, when any party participates in mediation conducted by a state or federal agency under the provisions of a collective bargaining law or similar statute, the agency's rules govern questions of privilege and confidentiality.

[ 2005 c 172 s 15; 1991 c 321 s 2.]

NOTES:

Short title—Effective date—2005 c 172: See RCW 7.07.900 and 7.07.904.

Severability—1991 c 321: See note following RCW 5.60.070.